Massachusetts, session 194th, S3087.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The charter of the town of Walpole as on file with the archivist of the
commonwealth in accordance with section 12 of chapter 43B of the Massachusetts general laws
is hereby amended by deleting section 3-8 of article III in its entirety and renumbering the
remaining sections of said article III accordingly.
SECTION 2. Said charter is hereby further amended by inserting in subsection (B) of
section 3-2 of article III the following new subsubsection:
(9) Sewer and Water. The select board shall have exclusive charge and control of the
installation and maintenance of the sewers, sewage treatment plants and appurtenances, and of
the water department and water system, and all of the powers reasonably necessary to effectuate
same. The select board may from time to time adopt reasonable rules and regulations in
connection therewith.
of 3

The select board shall have all the powers and duties given to sewer and water
commissioners under the constitution and general laws of the commonwealth, including
authority to set water and sewer rates, and such additional powers and duties as may be
authorized by this charter, by-law or other vote of the representative town meeting. The select
board shall assign all work and maintenance projects to the town administrator or the town
administrator's designee.
SECTION 3. Said charter is hereby further amended by inserting a new section 7-9 in
article VII of said charter, as follows:
Sewer and Water Advisory Board
(A) Composition: Term of Office. There shall be a sewer and water advisory board
consisting of 5 members appointed for 3 year overlapping terms so arranged that the terms of
office of not more than 2 members shall expire each year. Two members shall be appointed by
the select board, 2 by the finance committee and 1 by the moderator. A vacancy arising in the
office shall be filled by the appropriate appointing authority for the remainder of the unexpired
term.
(B) Powers and Duties. The sewer and water advisory board shall advise the select board
on policy and fiscal matters relative to the provision of municipal sewer system and water system
services as needed, including annual budgets and sewer and water rates, rather than on technical
or operational matters, and on such other matters involving the sewer system and water system as
may be requested by the select board or town administrator.
SECTION 4. On the effective date of this act, the terms of the elected incumbent
members of the sewer and water commission shall be terminated and the office abolished;
of 3

provided, however, that the members of the sewer and water commission then in office shall be
the initial members of the sewer and water advisory board created in accordance with section 3
of this act and shall serve in such capacity for a period equal to the remainder of their respective
elected terms or sooner vacating of office. Each vacancy arising thereafter shall be filled for the
remainder of the unexpired term, if applicable, and otherwise for a 3 year term, with the first 2
vacancies to be filled by the select board, the second 2 by the finance committee, and the third by
the moderator.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon its passage. Or do or act anything in relation
thereto.
of 3